dictionaries/hsb/hsb.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY aeonijwsrukthmcpldyzbćłšěźžčóřgfńvßxüäöáéAEONIJWSRUKTHMCPLDYZBĆŁŠĚŹŽČÓŘGFŃVßXÜÄÖÁÉ

PFX N Y 1
PFX N 0 nje .

PFX P Y 1
PFX P 0 pře .

PFX S Y 2
PFX S 0 naj .
PFX S 0 nanaj .

PFX s Y 9
PFX s 0 jedyna .
PFX s 0 dwaja .
PFX s 0 třia .
PFX s 0 štyria .
PFX s 0 pjeća .
PFX s 0 šěsća .
PFX s 0 sydoma .
PFX s 0 wosoma .
PFX s 0 dźewjeća .

PFX x Y 1
PFX x 0 ně .

SFX a Y 37
SFX a a y [^khjlćčšž]a
SFX a a i [kh]a
SFX a a e [jlćčšž]a
SFX a a je [pbrnmw]a
SFX a a i [lćčšž]a
SFX a ja i [pbrnmw]ja
SFX a a i [^pbrnmw]ja
SFX a ta će ta
SFX a a źe da
SFX a ka ce ka
SFX a ha ze [^c]ha
SFX a cha še cha
SFX a a u a
SFX a a ej [jlšzžźćč]a
SFX a 0 j [^jlšzžźćč]a
SFX a a ow a
SFX a a omaj a
SFX a a ojo a
SFX a 0 m a
SFX a a emi [jlćčšž]a
SFX a 0 mi [^jlćčšž]a
SFX a 0 ch a
SFX a a owy a
SFX a a owa a
SFX a a owe a
SFX a a oweho a
SFX a a oweje a
SFX a a owemu a
SFX a a owej a
SFX a a owym a
SFX a a owu a
SFX a a owaj a
SFX a a oweju a
SFX a a owymaj a
SFX a a owi a
SFX a a owych a
SFX a a owymi a



SFX b N 38
SFX b y ow [^c]y
SFX b y ow [^iel]cy
SFX b y 0 [lie]cy
SFX b y am y
SFX b y om icy
SFX b y ami y
SFX b y ach y
SFX b e ow e
SFX b e i [ćčlšźž]e
SFX b je i [prbmnw]je
SFX b e am e
SFX b e emi e
SFX b e ach e
SFX b i ow [kščh]i
SFX b i am [kščh]i
SFX b i ami [kh]i
SFX b i emi [šč]i
SFX b i ach [kčh]i
SFX b 0 jow [^kčh]i
SFX b 0 jam [^kčh]i
SFX b 0 jemi [^kčh]i
SFX b 0 jach [^kčh]i
SFX b ě ow ě
SFX b ě am ě
SFX b ě jemi ně
SFX b ě emi lě
SFX b ě ach ě
SFX b 0 ow tvxz]
SFX b 0 am tvxz]
SFX b 0 ami tvxz]
SFX b 0 ach tvxz]
SFX b a ow a
SFX b ja i [prbmnw]ja
SFX b a i a
SFX b 0 m a
SFX b a emi a
SFX b 0 mi a
SFX b 0 ach a

SFX e Y 92
SFX e a eje a
SFX e a ej a
SFX e a u a
SFX e a eju a
SFX e e o će
SFX e e och će
SFX e e ich će
SFX e e om će
SFX e e im će
SFX e e omi će
SFX e e imi će
SFX e će ty će
SFX e će ta će
SFX e će te će
SFX e će teho će
SFX e će teje će
SFX e će temu će
SFX e će tej će
SFX e će tu će
SFX e će tym će
SFX e će taj će
SFX e će teju će
SFX e će tymaj će
SFX e će tych će
SFX e će tymi će
SFX e 0 o ć
SFX e 0 och ć
SFX e 0 ich ć
SFX e 0 om ć
SFX e 0 im ć
SFX e 0 omi ć
SFX e 0 imi ć
SFX e i o ći
SFX e i och ći
SFX e i ich ći
SFX e i om ći
SFX e i im ći
SFX e i omi ći
SFX e i imi ći
SFX e ći ty ći
SFX e ći ta ći
SFX e ći te ći
SFX e ći teho ći
SFX e ći teje ći
SFX e ći temu ći
SFX e ći tej ći
SFX e ći tu ći
SFX e ći tym ći
SFX e ći taj ći
SFX e ći teju ći
SFX e ći tymaj ći
SFX e ći tych ći
SFX e ći tymi ći
SFX e t ćo at
SFX e t ćoch at
SFX e t ćich at
SFX e t ćom at
SFX e t ćim at
SFX e t ćomi at
SFX e t ćimi at
SFX e t ty at
SFX e t ta at
SFX e t te at
SFX e t teho at
SFX e t teje at
SFX e t temu at
SFX e t tej at
SFX e t tu at
SFX e t tym at
SFX e t taj at
SFX e t teju at
SFX e t tymaj at
SFX e t tych at
SFX e t tymi at
SFX e om mjo om
SFX e om mjoch om
SFX e om mjich om
SFX e om mjom om
SFX e om mjim om
SFX e om mjomi om
SFX e om mjimi om
SFX e i jo ri
SFX e i joch ri
SFX e i ich ri
SFX e i jom ri
SFX e i im ri
SFX e i jomi ri
SFX e i imi ri
SFX e i o ři
SFX e i och ři
SFX e i om ři
SFX e i omi ři

SFX d Y 36
SFX d a y [^khjčžšžćl]a
SFX d a i [kh]a
SFX d a ě [jžčšźćl]a
SFX d ła lě ła
SFX d a i [jščžźćl]a
SFX d a ě [bmnprw]a
SFX d ta ćě ta
SFX d da dźě da
SFX d cha šě cha
SFX d a u a
SFX d a ow a
SFX d a omaj a
SFX d a am a
SFX d a ami [^jlš]a
SFX d a emi [jlš]a
SFX d a ach a
SFX d 0 i [žščźć]
SFX d 0 ow [jščžźć]
SFX d 0 omaj [jščžźć]
SFX d 0 am [jščžźć]
SFX d 0 ěmi [žščźć]
SFX d 0 ach [jščźžć]
SFX d óc ocy óc
SFX d óc ocu óc
SFX d óc ocow óc
SFX d óc ocomaj óc
SFX d óc ocam óc
SFX d óc ocami óc
SFX d óc ocach óc
SFX d ěc jecy ěc
SFX d ěc jecu ěc
SFX d ěc jecow ěc
SFX d ěc jecomaj ěc
SFX d ěc jecam ěc
SFX d ěc jecami ěc
SFX d ěc jecach ěc

SFX p Y 15
SFX p ej wje ej
SFX p ej wi ej
SFX p ej wju ej
SFX p ej wjow ej
SFX p ej wjomaj ej
SFX p ej wjam ej
SFX p ej wjemi ej
SFX p ej wjach ej
SFX p ń nje ań
SFX p ń ni ań
SFX p ń nju ań
SFX p ń nje ań
SFX p ń njemi ań
SFX p ń njach ań
SFX p ń njow ań

SFX f Y 64
SFX f a y [^kghjčžšžćl]a
SFX f a i [kgh]a
SFX f a e [jžčšźćl]a
SFX f a i [jščžźćl]a
SFX f a je [bmnprw]a
SFX f ta će ta
SFX f da dźe [^a]da
SFX f da dźe [^j]ada
SFX f da dźe [^r]jada
SFX f da dźe [^h]rjada
SFX f ada edźe hrjada
SFX f ka ce ka
SFX f ha ze [^c]ha
SFX f ga ze ga
SFX f cha še cha
SFX f a u a
SFX f a ow a
SFX f a 0 ina
SFX f a omaj a
SFX f a am a
SFX f a ami [^jščžźćl]a
SFX f a ach a
SFX f 0 e [ljčžšźć]
SFX f 0 je [pr]
SFX f 0 i [ljžščźćpr]
SFX f ja i [bmnrpw]ja
SFX f a i [bmnrpw]ja
SFX f 0 ju [pr]
SFX f 0 y [scz]
SFX f 0 u [ljščžźćcsz]
SFX f 0 ow [ljščžźćcsz]
SFX f 0 jow [pr]
SFX f 0 omaj [ljščžźćcsz]
SFX f 0 jomaj [pr]
SFX f 0 am [ljščžźćcsz]
SFX f 0 jam [pr]
SFX f 0 emi [ljžščźć]
SFX f 0 jemi [pr]
SFX f 0 ami [scz]
SFX f 0 ach [ljščźžćcsz]
SFX f 0 jach [pr]
SFX f ń nje [^e]ń
SFX f ń ni [^e]ń
SFX f ń nju [^e]ń
SFX f ń njow [^e]ń
SFX f ń njomaj [^e]ń
SFX f ń njam [^e]ń
SFX f ń njemi [^e]ń
SFX f ń njach [^e]ń
SFX f a owy a
SFX f a owa a
SFX f a owe a
SFX f a oweho a
SFX f a oweje a
SFX f a owemu a
SFX f a owej a
SFX f a owym a
SFX f a owu a
SFX f a owaj a
SFX f a oweju a
SFX f a owymaj a
SFX f a owi a
SFX f a owych a
SFX f a owymi a

SFX g Y 48
SFX g 0 a .
SFX g 0 ej .
SFX g 0 om .
SFX g 0 u [jčźšć]an
SFX g 0 j [^jčźšć]an
SFX g 0 o .
SFX g 0 aj .
SFX g 0 ow .
SFX g 0 omaj .
SFX g an enjo [jčźšć]an
SFX g 0 ojo [^jčźšć]an
SFX g 0 am .
SFX g 0 ami .
SFX g 0 ach .
SFX g 0 owy .
SFX g 0 owa .
SFX g 0 owe .
SFX g 0 oweho .
SFX g 0 oweje .
SFX g 0 owemu .
SFX g 0 owej .
SFX g 0 owym .
SFX g 0 owu .
SFX g 0 owaj .
SFX g 0 oweju .
SFX g 0 owymaj .
SFX g 0 owi .
SFX g 0 owych .
SFX g 0 owymi .
SFX g 0 ski .
SFX g 0 ska .
SFX g 0 ske .
SFX g 0 skeho .
SFX g 0 skemu .
SFX g 0 skim .
SFX g 0 sku .
SFX g 0 skeje .
SFX g 0 skej .
SFX g 0 skeju .
SFX g 0 skimaj .
SFX g 0 skaj .
SFX g 0 scy .
SFX g 0 skich .
SFX g 0 skimi .
SFX g 0 skosć .
SFX g 0 skosće .
SFX g 0 skosću .
SFX g 0 skosći .

SFX h Y 46
SFX h 0 a .
SFX h 0 ej .
SFX h 0 om .
SFX h 0 u [sczkgh]
SFX h 0 je [bmnrpw]
SFX h t će t
SFX h d dźe d
SFX h 0 o .
SFX h k če wjek
SFX h c če ólc
SFX h z že njez
SFX h 0 aj [^l]
SFX h 0 ej l
SFX h 0 ow .
SFX h 0 omaj .
SFX h k cy k
SFX h t ća t
SFX h 0 ojo [^csz]
SFX h 0 ojo wótc
SFX h z ža knjez
SFX h 0 jo el
SFX h 0 y [zsc]
SFX h r řa tr
SFX h 0 am .
SFX h 0 ami [^l]
SFX h 0 emi l
SFX h 0 ach .
SFX h 0 owy .
SFX h 0 owa .
SFX h 0 owe .
SFX h 0 oweho .
SFX h 0 oweje .
SFX h 0 owemu .
SFX h 0 owej .
SFX h 0 owym .
SFX h 0 owu .
SFX h 0 owaj .
SFX h 0 oweju .
SFX h 0 owymaj .
SFX h 0 owi .
SFX h 0 owych .
SFX h 0 owymi .
SFX h 0 owosć .
SFX h 0 owosće .
SFX h 0 owosći .
SFX h 0 owosću .


SFX i Y 51
SFX i 0 ja .
SFX i 0 jej .
SFX i 0 jom .
SFX i 0 ju .
SFX i 0 jo .
SFX i 0 jow .
SFX i 0 jomaj .
SFX i 0 jam .
SFX i 0 jemi .
SFX i 0 jach .
SFX i 0 ski r
SFX i 0 ska r
SFX i 0 ske r
SFX i 0 skeho r
SFX i 0 skoh r
SFX i 0 skeje r
SFX i 0 skemu r
SFX i 0 skom r
SFX i 0 skej r
SFX i 0 sku r
SFX i 0 skim r
SFX i 0 skaj r
SFX i 0 skeju r
SFX i 0 skimaj r
SFX i 0 scy r
SFX i 0 skich r
SFX i 0 skimi r
SFX i 0 skosć r
SFX i 0 skosće r
SFX i 0 skosći r
SFX i 0 skosću r
SFX i 0 skosćow r
SFX i 0 skosćomaj r
SFX i 0 skosćam r
SFX i 0 skosćemi r
SFX i 0 skosćach r
SFX i 0 jowy r
SFX i 0 jowa r
SFX i 0 jowe r
SFX i 0 joweho r
SFX i 0 joweje r
SFX i 0 jowemu r
SFX i 0 jowej r
SFX i 0 jowym r
SFX i 0 jowu r
SFX i 0 jowaj r
SFX i 0 joweju r
SFX i 0 jowymaj r
SFX i 0 jowi r
SFX i 0 jowych r
SFX i 0 jowymi r
