dictionaries/hsb/hsb.dic
Allgäučan/g
Błócanjan/g
šema/f
šerpa/a
šěrachowski/PNYW
šěsćdźesat/es
šěsnaće/e
škorodej/fp
škra/d
škrja/d
špisar/i
štabry/b
što/zx
štyrceći/es
łža/d
łódźownik/hN
Ašgabaćan/gN
abonnement/hN
Achaiska/e
adrijatiski/PNYW
adwentistka/f
ćma/d
agent/hN
amfiteatraliski/PNYW
Andaluziska/e
Angelsaksa/a
Angolčan/gN
anonsa/f
antagonist/hN
antidźělčki/b
archeologa/a
Argentinska/e
artileristiski/PNYW
asistent/hN
astmatiski/PNYW
Awstralska/e
baby/i
Babylonjan/gN
Badensko-Württembergska/e
bakteriologa/a
banalnosć/f
Beduina/a
Bengalska/e
betonowanski/PNYW
biblioman/gN
Běčicy/b
blabowc/h
blada/a
Bohotska/e
bolborčanski/PNYW
bolosćiwosć/f
Bozankecy/b
Brazilska/e
britej/fp
Brěznjan/gN
bruttomzda/d
buštaj/N
car/i
chaota/a
Chilčan/gN
Chójnička/f
cholowčki/b
chribjetny/PNYW
chwalak/h
cyrkej/fp
dźewjećdźesat/es
dalai-lama/a
dań/p
debilny/PNYW
Debrikečan/gN
defloracija/f
delany/b
demisionować/NEX
dialektologa/a
didaktikar/i
diletant/h
dołhowječorny/PNYW
dohra/d
dresura/f
Drježdźany/b
drjebolić/NIX
dušepastyr/i
Dubrjenčan/gN
dwaceći/es
dwórny/PNYW
dwusplažnik/hN
čeho/zxq
čemu/zxq
česanki/b
čim/zxq
Eiffelowa/e
čim/zxq
činohra/d
eksklawa/f
eksperta/a
ekspresny/PNYW
čo/zxq
Esta/a
Estiska/e
fabrikaciski/PNYW
fachowc/h
fairny/PNYW
farmar/i
federacija/f
Fidźičan/gN
Filipiny/b
filologa/a
Francoska/e
Franka/a
Galliska/e
galwaniski/PNYW
ganowa/a
germanizacija/f
gorila/a
gradient/hN
gratej/fp
Grönlandska/e
Guatemalčan/gN
Hamita/a
hdźe/xzq
hdźe/xzu
hdy/xuz
hdy/xzq
helenistiski/PNYW
heroizować/NEX
hinaši/Yx
hladar/i
hlišće/b
Hlinjanka/f
Holešowčan/gN
Holsteinska/e
hra/d
hrodowski/PNYW
Hruboćicy/b
Huna/a
idejowosć/f
ilustrator/h
Indoneza/a
industrijny/PNYW
internować/NEX
inwestplan/gN
islamist/hN
Islandska/e
jednar/i
jednorosć/f
Jenkecy/b
Jordaničan/gN
kadla/a
kajkiž/yx
kak/x
kak/xu
kapitalny/PNYW
Katyrna/f
kawzy/b
Kazachska/e
kim/zxq
Kirgiza/a
klankar/i
knježićel/h
Košlan/gN
kołmazny/PNYW
koho/zxq
komandantura/f
komu/zxq
konserwator/h
Koporcy/b
koslowski/PNYW
kóstkowar/i
kotryž/yx
kotry/PNYWxz
kotry/Yx
krasniši/YS
krjepjawa/f
Kukecy/b
Kukečan/gN
kurkać/NAX
kursist/hN
lakěrar/i
Lappa/a
Leningradźanka/f
Litawska/e
Lombardičan/gN
lutowar/i
mša/d
mła/d
młodźinski/PNYW
makulatura/f
manufakturist/hN
Mecklenburgsko-Předpomorjan/gN
Melaneziska/e
mestica/a
meteoritiski/PNYW
Miłoćicy/b
měnitosć/f
mjelčer/i
mjezyhra/d
móc/dRNX
moldawski/PNYW
Montenegrowc/h
Morawjan/gN
morchej/fp
muškota/a
Mulkecy/b
mutel/f
mzda/d
nadypać/NAZ
namołwjer/i
nawalnik/hN
neofašistiski/PNYW
nettomzda/d
Njedźichowčan/gN
njedowěra/f
Njenc/hN
Njezdašecy/b
nóc/d
nomada/a
Norwegska/e
obskurant/h
oliwa/f
Žornosyčan/gN
ortopeda/a
Panecy/b
panoramatiski/PNYW
pasler/i
patologa/a
patriotka/f
pcha/d
perpendikularny/PNYW
pesimist/hN
pěc/d
pjatnaće/e
pjećdźesat/es
pjenjezy/b
połnóc/d
Połobjan/gN
połsta/s
podomar/i
přećeženy/PNYW
přećiwjeć/NAX
počatnik/hN
předehra/d
předejstwa/d
předstwa/d
přetyknyć/NZE
přijimowar/i
přisahanc/h
přiwalować/NEX
přizasłužba/f
poradźeny/PNYW
Porynska/e
poslenki/b
póstnicar/i
powěsnyć/NZE
pozitiwist/hN
Protečan/gN
psalmist/hN
pućrubar/i
putry/b
rada/a
radworski/PNYW
režiserka/f
regresiwny/PNYW
rejohra/d
restawrator/h
rjetkej/fp
rostlinar/i
rózarije/b
rozpławić/NIZ
Rudźan/gN
rukej/fp
Ruska/e
słódkowódny/PNYW
Słowinc/h
słowohra/d
słuchohra/d
sadar/i
sćinohra/d
Saksa/a
sanica/f
sanki/b
Saudi-Arabska/e
schorjeło/N
Skandinawiska/e
Skanečan/gN
směšak/i
Smječkecy/b
snob/h
solotej/fp
somatiski/PNYW
spediciski/PNYW
spisar/i
spěwohra/d
Sprjowje/b
SSowc/h
stajniši/YS
stewardesa/f
stwa/d
Suezčan/gN
swětłownik/hN
swětomudry/PNYW
sydom/e
sydomdźesat/es
symješkar/i
Tatry/b
tcha/d
technologa/a
tenorist/hN
třiceći/es
trěbnota/f
Turjan/gN
Turkowska/e
tykancar/i
ukrainski/PNYW
ultimatiwny/PNYW
wša/d
wšelčizny/b
Šwaba/a
Warnačan/gN
wiktualije/b
wjeselohra/d
wołojer/i
Wołynska/e
wobšudnik/hN
wobmjetować/NEX
wobtykowarka/f
wohroženy/PNYW
wójwoda/a
wopytowar/i
wósomdźesat/es
wosomdźesat/es
wosomdźesatory/PNYW
wotpłóčki/b
wotsaleć/NAX
wułožer/i
Wudworčan/gN
wukleskać/NAZ
wuliwny/PNYW
wulkopřekupc/h
wunamakar/i
wuspytować/NEX
zacpěwar/i
zagrotować/NEXZ
zapinanka/f
zaslepjeny/PNYW
zasopowědać/NAX
Zejicy/b
Zelenska/e
zhódawać/NAX
Zwickaučan/gN
zwónčkohra/d
zwučowar/i
mjeńši/YS
wjace/S
wuši/SY
hórši/SY
pozdźiši/YS
aktiwniši/YS
bicarniši/YS
brizantniši/SY
dewotniši/SY
ekscelentniši/SY
fenomenalniši/SY
furiozniši/SY
hrózbniši/SY
inkompetentniši/SY
katastrofalniši/SY
konkretniši/SY
legalniši/SY
młódniši/SY
nejkańši/SY
okultniši/SY
podobniši/SY
precizniši/SY
punktualniši/SY
reprezentatiwniši/SY
senilniši/SY
stajniši/SY
triumfalniši/SY
wuspěšniši/SY
struchliši/SY
lěńši/SY
